Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 481C.2, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. The department shall issue depredation permits and deer shooting permits to any landowner who incurs crop, horticultural product, tree, or nursery damage of one thousand dollars or more due to wild animals. Sec. 2. Section 483A.8, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7. The department shall make youth deer hunting licenses available for purchase during the same time period that general deer hunting licenses are available for purchase, including through all established deer hunting seasons. A person who is issued a youth deer hunting license may use the deer hunting license and tag during the season for which the license was issued or in any subsequent established deer hunting season using the a method of take authorized by rule for each that Senate File 423, p. 2 season being hunted . If the tag is filled during one of the seasons, the license will not be valid in subsequent seasons. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 423, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor